New York, session 2025-2026, A7005.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The section heading and subdivisions (a) and (b) of section 2 244-b of the domestic relations law, the section heading as amended and 3 subdivision (b) as added by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997 and subdivi- 4 sion (a) as amended by chapter 624 of the laws of 2002, are amended to 5 read as follows: 6 [Child support proceedings] Proceedings and enforcement of arrears; 7 suspension of driving privileges. 8 (a) In any proceeding for the enforcement of a direction or agreement, 9 incorporated in a judgment or order, to pay any sum of money as [child 10 support or combined child and] spousal support, if the court is satis- 11 fied by competent proof that the respondent has accumulated support 12 arrears equivalent to or greater than the amount of support due pursuant 13 to such judgment or order for a period of four months, the court may 14 order the department of motor vehicles to suspend the respondent's driv- 15 ing privileges, and if such order issues, the respondent may apply to 16 the department of motor vehicles for a restricted use license pursuant 17 to section five hundred thirty of the vehicle and traffic law. The court 18 may at any time upon payment of arrears or partial payment of arrears by 19 the respondent order the department of motor vehicles to terminate the 20 suspension of respondent's driving privileges. For purposes of determin- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03411-01-5 A. 7005 2 1 ing whether a support obligor has accumulated support arrears equivalent 2 to or greater than the amount of support due for a period of four 3 months, the amount of any retroactive support, other than periodic 4 payments of retroactive support which are past due, shall not be 5 included in the calculation of support arrears pursuant to this section. 6 (b) If the respondent, after receiving appropriate notice, fails to 7 comply with a summons, subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity [or 8 child support] proceeding, the court may order the department of motor 9 vehicles to suspend the respondent's driving privileges. The court may 10 subsequently order the department of motor vehicles to terminate the 11 suspension of the respondent's driving privileges; however, the court 12 shall order the termination of such suspension when the court is satis- 13 fied that the respondent has fully complied with all summonses, subpoe- 14 nas and warrants relating to a paternity [or child support] proceeding. 15 § 2. Subdivision 4-e of section 510 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 16 amended by chapter 601 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 4-e. Suspension and disqualification for failure [to make child 19 support payments or failure] to comply with a summons, subpoena or 20 warrant relating to a paternity [or child support] proceeding. (1) The 21 commissioner, on behalf of the department, shall enter into a written 22 agreement with the commissioner of the office of temporary and disabili- 23 ty assistance, on behalf of the office of temporary and disability 24 assistance, which shall set forth the procedures for suspending the 25 driving privileges of individuals who have failed to make payments of 26 [child support or combined child and] spousal support. 27 (2) Such agreement shall include: 28 (i) the procedure under which the office of temporary and disability 29 assistance shall notify the department of an individual's liability for 30 support arrears; 31 (ii) the procedure under which the department shall be notified by the 32 office of temporary and disability assistance that an individual has 33 satisfied or commenced payment of [his or her] such individual's support 34 arrears; or has made satisfactory payment arrangements thereon and shall 35 have the suspension of [his or her] such individual's driving privileges 36 terminated; 37 (iii) the procedure for reimbursement of the department and its agents 38 by the office of temporary and disability assistance for the full addi- 39 tional costs of carrying out the procedures authorized by this section, 40 and may include, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 41 a procedure for reimbursement of necessary additional costs of collect- 42 ing social security numbers pursuant to section five hundred two of this 43 title; 44 (iv) provision for the publicizing of sanctions for nonpayment of 45 [child] support including the potential for the suspension of delinquent 46 support obligors' driving privileges if they fail to pay [child support 47 or combined child and] spousal support; and 48 (v) such other matters as the parties to such agreement shall deem 49 necessary to carry out provisions of this section. 50 (3) Upon receipt of notification from the office of temporary and 51 disability assistance of a person's failure to satisfy support arrears 52 or to make satisfactory payment arrangements thereon pursuant to para- 53 graph (e) of subdivision twelve of section one hundred eleven-b of the 54 social services law or notification from a court issuing an order pursu- 55 ant to section four hundred fifty-eight-a of the family court act [or 56 section two hundred forty-four-b of the domestic relations law], the A. 7005 3 1 commissioner or [his or her] such commissioner's agent shall suspend the 2 license of such person to operate a motor vehicle. In the event such 3 person is unlicensed, such person's privilege of obtaining a license 4 shall be suspended. Such suspension shall take effect no later than 5 fifteen days from the date of the notice thereof to the person whose 6 license or privilege of obtaining a license is to be suspended, and 7 shall remain in effect until such time as the commissioner is advised 8 that the person has satisfied the support arrears or has made satisfac- 9 tory payment arrangements thereon pursuant to paragraph (e) of subdivi- 10 sion twelve of section one hundred eleven-b of the social services law 11 or until such time as the court issues an order to terminate such 12 suspension; 13 (4) From the time the commissioner is notified by the office of tempo- 14 rary and disability assistance of a person's liability for support 15 arrears under this section, the commissioner shall be relieved from all 16 liability to such person which may otherwise arise under this section, 17 and such person shall have no right to commence a court action or 18 proceeding or to any other legal recourse against the commissioner to 19 recover such driving privileges as authorized by this section. In addi- 20 tion, notwithstanding any other provision of law, such person shall have 21 no right to a hearing or appeal pursuant to this chapter with respect to 22 a suspension of driving privileges as authorized by this section. Howev- 23 er, nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit such person from 24 proceeding against the support collection unit pursuant to article 25 seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules. 26 (5) Any person whose license has been suspended pursuant to subdivi- 27 sion three of this section may apply for the issuance of a restricted 28 use license as provided in section five hundred thirty of this title. 29 § 3. Subdivision 12 of section 111-b of the social services law, as 30 added by chapter 81 of the laws of 1995, subparagraph 1 of paragraph (b) 31 as amended by chapter 624 of the laws of 2002 and paragraph (d) as 32 amended by chapter 309 of the laws of 1996, is amended to read as 33 follows: 34 12. (a) The department, through the commissioner, shall enter into the 35 agreement provided for in section five hundred ten of the vehicle and 36 traffic law and is authorized to furnish to the commissioner of motor 37 vehicles such information and to take such actions as may be necessary 38 to carry out the agreement provided for in such section, for the 39 enforcement of [child] spousal support orders through the suspension of 40 delinquent obligors' driving privileges. 41 (b) (1) When a support obligor who is or was under a court order to 42 pay [child support or combined child and] spousal support to a support 43 collection unit on behalf of persons receiving services under this title 44 has accumulated support arrears equivalent to or greater than the amount 45 of support due pursuant to such order for a period of four months, the 46 office of temporary and disability assistance shall notify the support 47 obligor in writing that [his or her] such obligor's continued failure to 48 pay the support arrears shall result in notification to the department 49 of motor vehicles to suspend the support obligor's driving privileges 50 unless the support obligor complies with the requirements set forth in 51 paragraph (e) of this subdivision. For purposes of determining whether a 52 support obligor has accumulated support arrears equivalent to or greater 53 than the amount of support due for a period of four months, the amount 54 of any retroactive support, other than periodic payments of retroactive 55 support which are past due, shall not be included in the calculation of 56 support arrears pursuant to this section; however, if at least four A. 7005 4 1 months of support arrears have accumulated subsequent to the date of the 2 court order, the entire amount of any retroactive support may be 3 collected pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision or as otherwise 4 authorized by law. 5 (2) The department shall provide the notice required by subparagraph 6 one of this paragraph by first class mail to the support obligor's last 7 known address or such other place where the support obligor is likely to 8 receive notice, or in the same manner as a summons may be served. 9 Forty-five days after the date of such notice, if the support obligor 10 has not challenged the determination of the support collection unit 11 pursuant to subparagraph one of paragraph (d) of this subdivision or if 12 the support obligor has failed to satisfy the arrears/past due support 13 or to otherwise comply with the requirements set forth in paragraph (e) 14 of this subdivision, the department shall notify the department of motor 15 vehicles that the support obligor's driving privileges are to be 16 suspended pursuant to section five hundred ten of the vehicle and traf- 17 fic law. Upon the support obligor's compliance with the provisions of 18 paragraph (e) of this subdivision, the department shall advise the 19 department of motor vehicles within five business days that the suspen- 20 sion of the support obligor's driving privileges shall be terminated. If 21 the support obligor appears in person at the support collection unit to 22 satisfy the requirements of paragraph (e) of this subdivision, the 23 support collection unit shall immediately provide a notice of compliance 24 to the support obligor, in addition to the notice sent directly to the 25 department of motor vehicles. 26 (3) Notwithstanding the requirements of this subdivision, no notice 27 shall be issued by the department pursuant to subparagraph one of this 28 paragraph to a support obligor from whom support payments are being 29 received by the support collection unit as a result of an income 30 execution or an income deduction order issued pursuant to section five 31 thousand two hundred forty-one or five thousand two hundred forty-two of 32 the civil practice law and rules. 33 (c) The notice provided to a support obligor by the department pursu- 34 ant to paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall contain the caption of 35 the order of support, the date the order of support was entered, the 36 court in which it was entered, the amount of the periodic payments 37 directed, and the amount of arrears/past due support. In addition, the 38 notice shall include: 39 (1) an explanation of the action required pursuant to paragraph (e) of 40 this subdivision to be taken by the support obligor to avoid the suspen- 41 sion of [his or her] such obligor's driving privileges; 42 (2) a statement that forty-five days after the date of the notice, the 43 department of motor vehicles will be notified to suspend the support 44 obligor's driving privileges unless the support obligor may challenge 45 the support collection unit's determination as set forth in paragraph 46 (d) of this subdivision within forty-five days of the date of such 47 notice; a statement of the manner in which the support obligor may chal- 48 lenge the determination, and a statement that if the support obligor 49 challenges the determination, a review will be completed by the support 50 collection unit within seventy-five days of the date of the notice; 51 (3) a statement that if the support obligor does not challenge the 52 support collection unit's determination then the department of motor 53 vehicles shall be notified to suspend the support obligor's driving 54 privileges unless the support obligor contacts the support collection 55 unit to arrange for full payment or commencement of satisfactory payment 56 arrangements on the arrears/past due support, or to comply otherwise A. 7005 5 1 with the requirements set forth in paragraph (e) of this subdivision, 2 within forty-five days of the date of the notice; 3 (4) the address and telephone number of the support collection unit 4 that the support obligor may contact to request information about a 5 challenge or to comply with the requirements set forth in paragraph (e) 6 of this subdivision; 7 (5) a statement that the suspension of driving privileges will contin- 8 ue until the support obligor pays the support arrears or complies other- 9 wise with the requirements set forth in paragraph (e) of this subdivi- 10 sion; and 11 (6) a statement printed in boldface type that the support obligor's 12 intentional submission of false written statements to the support 13 collection unit for the purpose of frustrating or defeating the lawful 14 enforcement of support obligations is punishable pursuant to section 15 175.35 of the penal law. 16 (d) (1) A support obligor may challenge in writing the correctness of 17 the determination of the support collection unit that the obligor's 18 driving privileges should be suspended, and in support of the challenge 19 may submit documentation demonstrating mistaken identity, error in 20 calculation of arrears, financial exemption from license suspension 21 pursuant to the conditions enumerated in paragraph (e) of this subdivi- 22 sion, the absence of an underlying court order to support such determi- 23 nation, or other reason that the person is not subject to such determi- 24 nation. Such documents may include but are not limited to a copy of the 25 order of support pursuant to which the obligor claims to have made 26 payment, other relevant court orders, copies of cancelled checks, 27 receipts for support payments, pay stubs or other documents identifying 28 wage withholding, and proof of identity. The support collection unit 29 shall review the documentation submitted by the support obligor, shall 30 adjust the support obligor's account if appropriate, and shall notify 31 the support obligor of the results of the review initiated in response 32 to the challenge within seventy-five days from the date of the notice 33 required by paragraph (b) of this subdivision. If the support collection 34 unit's review indicates that the determination to suspend driving privi- 35 leges was correct, the support collection unit shall notify the support 36 obligor of the results of the review and that the support obligor has 37 thirty-five days from the date of mailing of such notice to satisfy the 38 full amount of the arrears or commence payment of the arrears/past due 39 support as specified in paragraph (e) of this subdivision and if the 40 support obligor fails to do so, the support collection unit shall notify 41 the department of motor vehicles to suspend the support obligor's driv- 42 ing privileges pursuant to section five hundred ten of the vehicle and 43 traffic law. The support obligor shall be further notified that if the 44 support obligor files objections with the family court and serves these 45 objections on the support collection unit within thirty-five days from 46 the date of mailing of the notice denying the challenge pursuant to 47 subdivision five of section four hundred fifty-four of the family court 48 act, the support collection unit shall not notify the department of 49 motor vehicles to suspend the support obligor's driving privileges until 50 fifteen days after entry of judgement by the family court denying the 51 objections. 52 (2) A support obligor may within thirty-five days of mailing of the 53 notice denying [his or her] such obligor's challenge by the support 54 collection unit request that the family court review the support 55 collection unit's determination pursuant to subdivision five of section 56 four hundred fifty-four of the family court act. If the support obligor A. 7005 6 1 requests the family court to review the determination of the support 2 collection unit, the support collection unit shall not notify the 3 department of motor vehicles to suspend the support obligor's driving 4 privileges until fifteen days after mailing of a copy of the judgment by 5 the family court to the support obligor denying the objections. 6 (e) A support obligor who has received a notice that [his or her] such 7 obligor's driving privileges shall be suspended may avoid the suspension 8 by: 9 (1) making full payment of all arrears/past due support to the support 10 collection unit; or 11 (2) making satisfactory payment arrangements with the support 12 collection unit for payment of the arrears/past due support and the 13 current support obligation. "Satisfactory payment arrangements" shall 14 mean: 15 (i) execution of a confession of judgment for the total balance of the 16 arrears/past due support; and 17 (ii) execution of a verified statement of net worth on a form 18 prescribed by the commissioner setting forth the obligor's income from 19 all sources, liquid assets and holdings, copies of the obligor's drivers 20 license, most recent federal and state tax return, and a representative 21 pay stub, and an eighteen month employment history; and 22 (iii) execution and verification of a stipulation that the obligor 23 will notify the support collection unit of all future changes of address 24 until such time as the obligation to pay support is terminated; and 25 (iv) payment of support to the support collection unit by income 26 execution pursuant to section five thousand two hundred forty-one of the 27 civil practice law and rules, which shall include deductions sufficient 28 to ensure compliance with the direction in the order of support and 29 shall include an additional amount to be applied to the reduction of 30 arrears as required by subdivision (b) of such section, or by execution 31 of an agreement for payment of the arrears/past due support and any 32 current support directly to the support collection unit in an amount 33 which is consistent with that which would have been made under such an 34 income execution; provided however, that where the support obligor fails 35 to comply with the agreement, [he/she] such obligor may avoid or termi- 36 nate the suspension of driving privileges only by making at least fifty 37 percent payment of all arrears/past due support to the support 38 collection unit and in addition, entering into a payment plan pursuant 39 to this subdivision with the support collection unit within fifteen 40 days. However, in any case when the support obligor fails to comply 41 with a payment plan as described herein more than once within twelve 42 months, the obligor must pay the balance of all arrears/past due support 43 to avoid or terminate license suspension. "Failure to comply" for these 44 purposes shall mean missing payments in an amount equivalent to four 45 months of support under the payment plan, unless the support obligor 46 demonstrates that [he or she] such obligor has filed a petition for 47 modification that is pending; or 48 (3) providing documentation that shows the support obligor is receiv- 49 ing public assistance or supplemental security income; or 50 (4) providing to the support collection unit the documentation 51 required by clauses (i) through (iii) of subparagraph two of this para- 52 graph, where such documentation is sufficient for the support collection 53 unit to determine: 54 (i) that the support obligor's income, as defined by subparagraph five 55 of paragraph (b) of subdivision one of section four hundred thirteen of 56 the family court act, falls below the self-support reserve as defined by A. 7005 7 1 subparagraph six of paragraph (b) of subdivision one of section four 2 hundred thirteen of the family court act; or 3 (ii) that the amount of the support obligor's income, as defined by 4 subparagraph five of paragraph (b) of subdivision one of section four 5 hundred thirteen of the family court act, remaining after the payment of 6 the current support obligation would fall below the self-support reserve 7 as defined by subparagraph six of paragraph (b) of subdivision one of 8 section four hundred thirteen of the family court act. 9 (f) A support obligor who alleges that [he or she] such obligor has 10 not received actual notice pursuant to paragraph one of subdivision (b) 11 of this section and whose driving privileges were suspended may at any 12 time request a review pursuant to subdivision (d) of this section or 13 comply with the requirements of subdivision (e) of this section, and 14 upon a determination that [he or she] such obligor has not accumulated 15 support arrears equivalent to or greater than the amount of support due 16 for a period of four months or that [he or she] such obligor meets the 17 requirements of subdivision (e) of this section, the department shall 18 notify the department of motor vehicles that the suspension of driving 19 privileges shall be terminated. 20 § 4. Subdivision (b) of section 458-a of the family court act, as 21 added by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997, is amended to read as follows: 22 (b) If the respondent, after receiving appropriate notice, fails to 23 comply with a summons, subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity [or 24 child support] proceeding, the court may order the department of motor 25 vehicles to suspend the respondent's driving privileges. The court may 26 subsequently order the department of motor vehicles to terminate the 27 suspension of the respondent's driving privileges; however, the court 28 shall order the termination of such suspension when the court is satis- 29 fied that the respondent has fully complied with the requirements of all 30 summonses, subpoenas and warrants relating to a paternity [or child 31 support] proceeding. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize the 32 court to terminate the respondent's suspension of driving privileges 33 except as provided in this subdivision. 34 § 5. The section heading and subdivisions (a) and (b) of section 244-c 35 of the domestic relations law, the section heading as amended and subdi- 36 vision (b) as added by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997 and subdivision 37 (a) as amended by chapter 624 of the laws of 2002, are amended to read 38 as follows: 39 [Child support proceedings] Proceedings and enforcement of arrears; 40 suspensions of state professional, occupational and business licenses. 41 (a) In any proceeding for enforcement of a direction or agreement, 42 incorporated in a judgement or order, to pay any sum of money as [child 43 support or combined child and] spousal support, if the court is satis- 44 fied by competent proof that the respondent has accumulated support 45 arrears equivalent to or greater than the amount of support due pursuant 46 to such judgment or order for a period of four months and that the 47 respondent is licensed, permitted or registered by or with a board, 48 department, authority or office of this state to conduct a trade, busi- 49 ness, profession or occupation, the court may order such board, depart- 50 ment, authority or office to commence proceedings as required by law 51 regarding the suspension of such license, permit, registration, or 52 authority to practice and to inform the court of the actions it has 53 taken pursuant to such proceedings. For purposes of determining whether 54 a respondent has accumulated support arrears equivalent to or greater 55 than the amount of support due for a period of four months, the amount 56 of any retroactive support, other than periodic payments of retroactive A. 7005 8 1 support which are past due, shall not be included in the calculation of 2 support arrears pursuant to this section. 3 (b) If the respondent, after receiving appropriate notice, fails to 4 comply with a summons, subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity [or 5 child support] proceeding, and the court has determined that the 6 respondent is licensed, permitted or registered by or with a board, 7 department, authority or office of this state or one of its political 8 subdivisions or instrumentalities to conduct a trade, business, profes- 9 sion or occupation, the court may order such board, department, authori- 10 ty or office to commence proceedings as required by law regarding the 11 suspension of such license, permit, registration or authority to prac- 12 tice and to inform the court of the actions it has taken pursuant to 13 such proceeding. The court may subsequently order such board, depart- 14 ment, authority or office to terminate the suspension of the respond- 15 ent's license, permit, registration or authority to practice; however, 16 the court shall order the termination of such suspension when the court 17 is satisfied that the respondent has fully complied with all summons, 18 subpoenas and warrants relating to a paternity [or child support] 19 proceeding. 20 § 6. Paragraphs (a), (b), (d) and (g) of subdivision 4 of section 119 21 of the alcoholic beverage control law, paragraphs (a) and (b) as amended 22 and paragraph (d) as added by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997 and para- 23 graph (g) as added by chapter 81 of the laws of 1995 and as relettered 24 by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997, are amended to read as follows: 25 (a) The provisions of this subdivision shall apply in all cases of 26 licensee or permittee failure after receiving appropriate notice, to 27 comply with a summons, subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity [or 28 child support] proceeding and arrears in payment of [child support or 29 combined child and] spousal support referred to the authority by a court 30 pursuant to the requirements of section [two hundred forty-four-c of the 31 domestic relations law or pursuant to section] four hundred 32 fifty-eight-b or five hundred forty-eight-b of the family court act. 33 (b) Upon receipt of an order from the court based on arrears in 34 payment of [child support or combined child and] spousal support pursu- 35 ant to one of the foregoing provisions of law, the authority, if it 36 finds such person to have been issued a license or permit, shall within 37 thirty days of receipt of such order from the court, provide notice to 38 the licensee or permittee of, and initiate, a hearing which shall be 39 held at least twenty days and no more than thirty days after the sending 40 of such notice to the licensee or permittee. The hearing shall be sole- 41 ly held for the purpose of determining whether there exists as of the 42 date of the hearing proof that full payment of all arrears of support 43 established by the order of the court to be due from the licensee or 44 permittee have been paid. Proof of such payment shall be a certified 45 check showing full payment of established arrears or a notice issued by 46 the court or the support collection unit, where the order is payable to 47 the support collection unit designated by the appropriate social 48 services district. Such notice shall state that full payment of all 49 arrears of support established by the order of the court to be due have 50 been paid. The licensee or permittee shall be given full opportunity to 51 present such proof of payment at the hearing in person or by counsel. 52 The only issue to be determined by the authority as a result of the 53 hearing is whether the arrears have been paid. No evidence with respect 54 to the appropriateness of the court order or ability of the respondent 55 party in arrears to comply with such order shall be received or consid- 56 ered by the authority. A. 7005 9 1 (d) Upon receipt of an order from the court based on failure to 2 comply with a summons, subpoena, or warrant relating to a paternity [or 3 child support] proceeding, the authority, if it finds such person has 4 been issued a license or permit, shall within thirty days of receipt of 5 such order from the court, provide notice to the licensee or permittee 6 that [his or her] such licensee or permittee's license shall be 7 suspended in sixty days unless the conditions in paragraph (e) of this 8 subdivision are met. 9 (g) This subdivision applies to support obligations paid pursuant to 10 any order of [child support or child and] spousal support issued under 11 provisions of [article three-A or] section two hundred thirty-six or two 12 hundred forty of the domestic relations law, or article four, five or 13 five-A of the family court act. 14 § 7. Section 6509-b of the education law, as added by chapter 81 of 15 the laws of 1995, is amended to read as follows: 16 § 6509-b. Additional definition of professional misconduct; arrears in 17 payment of support; limited application. 1. The provisions of this 18 section shall apply in all cases of licensee or registrant arrears in 19 payment of [child support or combined child and] spousal support 20 referred to the board of regents by a court pursuant to the requirements 21 of [section two hundred forty-four-c of the domestic relations law or 22 pursuant to] section four hundred fifty-eight-b of the family court act. 23 2. Upon receipt of an order from the court pursuant to one of the 24 foregoing provisions of law, the board of regents, if it finds such 25 person to be so licensed or registered, shall within thirty days of 26 receipt of such order from the court, provide notice to the licensee or 27 registrant of, and cause the regents review committee to initiate, a 28 hearing which shall be held at least twenty days and no more than thirty 29 days after the sending of such notice to the licensee or registrant. The 30 hearing shall be held solely for the purpose of determining whether 31 there exists as of the date of the hearing proof that full payment of 32 all arrears of support established by the order of the court to be due 33 from the licensee or registrant have been paid. Proof of such payment 34 shall be a certified check showing full payment of established arrears 35 or a notice issued by the court or by the support collection unit where 36 the order is payable to the support collection unit designated by the 37 appropriate social services district. Such notice shall state that full 38 payment of all arrears of support established by the order of the court 39 to be due have been paid. The licensee or registrant shall be given full 40 opportunity to present such proof of payment at the hearing in person or 41 by counsel. The only issue to be determined by the regents review 42 committee as a result of the hearing is whether the arrears have been 43 paid. No evidence with respect to the appropriateness of the court order 44 or ability of the respondent party in arrears to comply with such order 45 shall be received or considered by the committee. 46 3. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this article or of 47 any other provision of law to the contrary, the license or registration 48 of a person subject to the provisions of this title and/or subject to 49 the provisions of title two-A of article two of the public health law 50 shall be suspended if, at the hearing provided for by subdivision two of 51 this section, the licensee or registrant fails to present proof of 52 payment as required by such subdivision. Such suspension shall not be 53 lifted unless the court or the support collection unit, where the court 54 order is payable to the support collection unit designated by the appro- 55 priate social services district, issues notice to the regents review A. 7005 10 1 committee that full payment of all arrears of support established by the 2 order of the court to be due have been paid. 3 4. The board of regents shall inform the court of all actions taken 4 hereunder as required by law. 5 5. This section applies to support obligations paid pursuant to any 6 order of [child support or child and] spousal support issued under 7 provisions of [article three-A or] section two hundred thirty-six or two 8 hundred forty of the domestic relations law, or article four, five or 9 five-A of the family court act. 10 6. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this article or of 11 any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of this 12 section shall apply to the exclusion of any other requirements of this 13 article and to the exclusion of any other requirement of law to the 14 contrary. 15 § 8. Section 6509-c of the education law, as added by chapter 398 of 16 the laws of 1997, is amended to read as follows: 17 § 6509-c. Additional definition of professional misconduct; failure 18 to comply in paternity [or child support] proceedings; limited applica- 19 tion. 1. The provisions of this section shall apply in all cases of 20 licensee or registrant failure after receiving appropriate notice, to 21 comply with a summons, subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity [or 22 child support] proceeding referred to the board of regents by a court 23 pursuant to the requirements of [section two hundred forty-four-c of the 24 domestic relations law or pursuant to] section four hundred 25 fifty-eight-b or five hundred forty-eight-b of the family court act. 26 2. Upon receipt of an order from the court pursuant to one of the 27 foregoing provisions of law, the board of regents, if it finds such 28 person to be so licensed or registered, shall within thirty days of 29 receipt of such order from the court, provide notice to the licensee or 30 registrant that [his or her] such licensee or registrant's license or 31 registration shall be suspended in sixty days unless the conditions as 32 set forth in subdivision three of this section are met. 33 3. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this article or of 34 any other provision of law to the contrary, the license or registration 35 of a person subject to the provisions of this title and/or subject to 36 the provisions of title two-A of article two of the public health law 37 shall be suspended unless the court terminates its order to commence 38 suspension proceedings. Such suspension shall not be lifted unless the 39 court issues an order to the board of regents terminating its order to 40 commence suspension proceedings. 41 4. The board of regents shall inform the court of all actions taken 42 hereunder as required by law. 43 5. This section applies to paternity [or child support] proceedings 44 commenced under, and support obligations paid pursuant to any order of 45 [child support or child and] spousal support issued under provisions of 46 section two hundred thirty-six or two hundred forty of the domestic 47 relations law, or article four, five, five-A or five-B of the family 48 court act. 49 6. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this article or of 50 any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of this 51 section shall apply to the exclusion of any other requirements of this 52 article and to the exclusion of any other requirement of law to the 53 contrary. 54 § 9. Subdivision 2-a of section 90 of the judiciary law, as amended by 55 chapter 398 of the laws of 1997, is amended to read as follows: A. 7005 11 1 2-a. a. The provisions of this subdivision shall apply in all cases of 2 an attorney licensed, registered or admitted to practice in this state 3 who has failed after receiving appropriate notice, to comply with a 4 summons, subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity [or child support] 5 proceeding involving [him or her] such attorney personally, or who is in 6 arrears in payment of [child support or combined child and] spousal 7 support which matter shall be referred to the appropriate appellate 8 division by a court pursuant to the requirements of section [two hundred 9 forty-four-c of the domestic relations law or pursuant to section] four 10 hundred fifty-eight-b or five hundred forty-eight-b of the family court 11 act. 12 b. Upon receipt of an order from the court based on arrears in payment 13 of [child support or combined child and] spousal support pursuant to one 14 of the foregoing provisions of law, the appropriate appellate division 15 within thirty days of receipt of such order, if it finds such person to 16 be so licensed, registered or admitted, shall provide notice to such 17 attorney of, and initiate, a hearing which shall be held by it at least 18 twenty days and no more than thirty days after the sending of such 19 notice to the attorney. The hearing shall be held solely for the purpose 20 of determining whether there exists as of the date of the hearing proof 21 that full payment of all arrears of support established by the order of 22 the court to be due from the licensed, registered or admitted attorney 23 have been paid. Proof of such payment shall be a certified check showing 24 full payment of established arrears or a notice issued by the court or 25 the support collection unit where the order is payable to the support 26 collection unit designated by the appropriate social services district. 27 Such notice shall state that full payment of all arrears of support 28 established by the order of the court to be due have been paid. The 29 licensed attorney shall be given full opportunity to present such proof 30 of payment at the hearing in person or by counsel. The only issue to be 31 determined as a result of the hearing is whether the arrears have been 32 paid. No evidence with respect to the appropriateness of the court order 33 or ability of the respondent party in arrears to comply with such order 34 shall be received or considered by the disciplinary committee. 35 c. Upon receipt of an order from the court based on failure to comply 36 with a summons, subpoena, or warrant relating to a paternity [or child 37 support] proceeding, the appropriate appellate division within thirty 38 days of receipt of such order, if it finds such person to be so 39 licensed, registered or admitted, shall provide notice to such attorney 40 that [his or her] such attorney's license shall be suspended within 41 sixty days of such notice to the attorney unless the conditions in para- 42 graph e of this section are met. 43 d. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this section or of 44 any other provision of law to the contrary, the license to practice law 45 in this state of an attorney admitted to practice shall be suspended by 46 the appellate division if, at the hearing provided for by paragraph b of 47 this subdivision, the licensed attorney fails to present proof of 48 payments as required by such subdivision. Such suspension shall not be 49 lifted unless the original court or the support collection unit, where 50 the court order is payable to the support collection unit designated by 51 the appropriate social services district, issues notice to the appellate 52 division that full payment of all arrears of support established by the 53 order of the original court to be due have been paid. 54 e. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this section or of 55 any other provision of law to the contrary, the license of an attorney 56 admitted to practice law in this state shall be suspended by the appel- A. 7005 12 1 late division, in accordance with paragraph c of this subdivision unless 2 the court terminates its order to commence suspension proceedings. Such 3 suspension shall not be lifted unless the court issues an order to the 4 appellate division terminating its order to commence suspension 5 proceedings. 6 f. The appellate division shall inform the original court of all 7 actions taken hereunder. 8 g. This subdivision [two-a] applies to paternity [and child support] 9 proceedings commenced under, and support obligations paid pursuant to 10 any order of [child support or child and] spousal support issued under 11 provisions of section two hundred thirty-six or two hundred forty of the 12 domestic relations law, or article four, five, five-A or five-B of the 13 family court act. 14 h. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this section or of 15 any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of this 16 subdivision [two-a] shall apply to the exclusion of any other require- 17 ments of this section and to the exclusion of any other requirement of 18 law to the contrary. 19 § 10. Subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii) and (vii) of paragraph (b) of 20 subdivision 1 of section 441-c of the real property law, subparagraph 21 (i) as amended by chapter 529 of the laws of 2022 and subparagraphs 22 (ii), (iii) and (vii) as amended by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997, are 23 amended to read as follows: 24 (i) The provisions of this paragraph shall apply in all cases of 25 licensed broker or licensed salesperson who have failed, after receiving 26 appropriate notice, to comply with a summons, subpoena or warrant relat- 27 ing to a paternity [or child support] proceeding or is in arrears in 28 payment of [child support or combined child and] spousal support 29 referred to the department by a court pursuant to the requirements of 30 section [two hundred forty-four-c of the domestic relations law or 31 pursuant to section] four hundred fifty-eight-b or five hundred forty- 32 eight-b of the family court act. 33 (ii) Upon receipt of an order from the court pursuant to one of the 34 foregoing provisions of law based on arrears in payment of [child 35 support or combined child and] spousal support, the department, if it 36 finds such person to be so licensed, shall within thirty days of receipt 37 of such order from the court, provide notice to the licensee of, and 38 initiate, a hearing which shall be held by it at least twenty days and 39 no more than thirty days after the sending of such notice to the licen- 40 see. The hearing shall be held solely for the purpose of determining 41 whether there exists as of the date of the hearing proof that full 42 payment of all arrears of support established by the order of the court 43 to be due from the licensee have been paid. Proof of such payment shall 44 be a certified check showing full payment of established arrears or a 45 notice issued by the court, or the support collection unit where the 46 order is payable to the support collection unit designated by the appro- 47 priate social services district. Such notice shall state that full 48 payment of all arrears of support established by the order of the court 49 to be due have been paid. The licensee shall be given full opportunity 50 to present such proof of payment from the court or support collection 51 unit at the hearing in person or by counsel. The only issue to be deter- 52 mined by the department as a result of the hearing is whether the 53 arrears have been paid. No evidence with respect to the appropriateness 54 of the court order or ability of the respondent party in arrears to 55 comply with such order shall be received or considered by the depart- 56 ment. A. 7005 13 1 (iii) Upon receipt of an order from the court based on failure to 2 comply with a summons, subpoena, or warrant relating to a paternity [or 3 child support] proceeding, the department, if it finds such person to be 4 so licensed, shall within thirty days of receipt of such order from the 5 court, provide notice to the licensee that [his or her] such licensee's 6 license shall be suspended within sixty days unless the conditions in 7 subparagraph (v) of this section are met. 8 (vii) This paragraph applies to paternity [and child support] 9 proceedings commenced under, and support obligations paid pursuant to 10 any order of [child support or child and] spousal support issued under 11 provisions of section two hundred thirty-six or two hundred forty of the 12 domestic relations law, or article four, five, five-A or five-B of the 13 family court act. 14 § 11. The section heading and subdivisions (a) and (b) of section 15 244-d of the domestic relations law, the section heading and subdivision 16 (b) as added by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997 and subdivision (a) as 17 amended by chapter 624 of the laws of 2002, are amended to read as 18 follows: 19 [Child support proceedings] Proceedings and enforcement of arrears; 20 suspension of recreational license. 21 (a) In any proceeding for enforcement of a direction or agreement, 22 incorporated in a judgement or order, to pay any sum of money as [child 23 support or combined child and] spousal support, if the court is satis- 24 fied by competent proof that the respondent has accumulated support 25 arrears equivalent to or greater than the amount of support due pursuant 26 to such judgment or order for a period of four months, the court may 27 order any agency responsible for the issuance of a recreational license 28 to suspend or refuse to reissue a license to the respondent, or deny 29 application for such license by the respondent. For purposes of deter- 30 mining whether a respondent has accumulated support arrears equivalent 31 to or greater than the amount of support due for a period of four 32 months, the amount of any retroactive support, other than periodic 33 payments of retroactive support which are past due, shall not be 34 included in the calculation of support arrears pursuant to this section. 35 (b) If the respondent, after receiving appropriate notice, fails to 36 comply with a summons, subpoena, or warrant relating to a paternity [or 37 child support] proceeding, the court may order any agency responsible 38 for the issuance of a recreational license to suspend or to refuse to 39 reissue a license to the respondent or to deny application for such 40 license by the respondent. The court may subsequently order such agency 41 to terminate the adverse action regarding the respondent's license; 42 however, the court shall order the termination of such suspension or 43 other adverse action when the court is satisfied that the respondent has 44 fully complied with the requirements of all summons, subpoenas, and 45 warrants relating to a paternity [or child support] proceeding. 46 § 12. Paragraph 13 of subsection (a) of section 2110 of the insurance 47 law is REPEALED and paragraphs 14, 15, 16 and 17 are renumbered para- 48 graphs 13, 14, 15 and 16, paragraphs 16 and 17 as renumbered by chapter 49 546 of the laws of 2013. 50 § 13. Subdivision (b) of section 458-a of the family court act, as 51 added by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997, is amended to read as follows: 52 (b) If the respondent, after receiving appropriate notice, fails to 53 comply with a summons, subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity [or 54 child support] proceeding, the court may order the department of motor 55 vehicles to suspend the respondent's driving privileges. The court may 56 subsequently order the department of motor vehicles to terminate the A. 7005 14 1 suspension of the respondent's driving privileges; however, the court 2 shall order the termination of such suspension when the court is satis- 3 fied that the respondent has fully complied with the requirements of all 4 summonses, subpoenas and warrants relating to a paternity [or child 5 support] proceeding. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize the 6 court to terminate the respondent's suspension of driving privileges 7 except as provided in this subdivision. 8 § 14. The section heading and subdivisions (b) and (c) of section 9 458-b of the family court act, the section heading and subdivision (c) 10 as amended and subdivision (b) as added by chapter 398 of the laws of 11 1997, are amended to read as follows: 12 [Child support proceedings] Proceedings and enforcement of arrears; 13 suspension of state professional, occupational and business licenses. 14 (b) If the respondent after receiving appropriate notice, fails to 15 comply with a summons, subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity [or 16 child support] proceeding, and the court has determined that the 17 respondent is licensed, permitted or registered by or with a board, 18 department, authority or office of this state or one of its political 19 subdivisions or instrumentalities to conduct a trade, business, profes- 20 sion or occupation, the court may order such board, department, authori- 21 ty or office to commence proceedings as required by law regarding the 22 suspension of such license, permit, registration or authority to prac- 23 tice and to inform the court of the actions it has taken pursuant to 24 such proceeding. The court may subsequently order such board, depart- 25 ment, authority or office to terminate the suspension of the respond- 26 ent's license, permit, registration or authority to practice; however, 27 the court shall order the termination of such suspension when the court 28 is satisfied that the respondent has fully complied with the require- 29 ments of all summonses, subpoenas and warrants relating to a paternity 30 [or child support] proceeding. 31 (c) If the court determines that the suspension of the license, permit 32 or registration of the respondent would create an extreme hardship to 33 either the licensee, permittee or registrant or to persons whom [he or 34 she] such licensee, permittee or registrant serves, the court may, in 35 lieu of suspension, suspend the order described in subdivision (a) of 36 this section to the licensing entity for a period not to exceed one 37 year. If on or before the expiration of this period the court has not 38 received competent proof presented at hearing that the respondent is in 39 full compliance with [his or her] such respondent's support obligation 40 and has fully complied with all summons, subpoenas and warrants relating 41 to a paternity [or child support] proceeding, the court shall cause the 42 suspension of the order to be removed and shall further cause such order 43 to be served upon the licensing entity. 44 § 15. The section heading and subdivision (b) of section 458-c of the 45 family court act, as added by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997, are 46 amended to read as follows: 47 [Child support proceedings] Proceedings and enforcement of arrears; 48 suspension of recreational licenses. 49 (b) If the respondent, after receiving appropriate notice, fails to 50 comply with a summons, subpoena, or warrant relating to a paternity [or 51 child support] proceeding, the court may order any agency responsible 52 for the issuance of a recreational license to suspend or to refuse to 53 reissue a license to the respondent or to deny application for such 54 license by the respondent. The court may subsequently order such agency 55 to terminate the adverse action regarding the respondent's license; 56 however, the court shall order the termination of such suspension or A. 7005 15 1 other adverse action when the court is satisfied that the respondent has 2 fully complied with the requirements of all summons, subpoenas, and 3 warrants relating to a paternity [or child support] proceeding. 4 § 16. Section 548-a of the family court act, as added by chapter 398 5 of the laws of 1997, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 548-a. Paternity [or child support] proceedings; suspension of 7 driving privileges. (a) If the respondent, after receiving appropriate 8 notice, fails to comply with a summons, subpoena or warrant relating to 9 a paternity [or child support] proceeding, the court may order the 10 department of motor vehicles to suspend the respondent's driving privi- 11 leges. 12 (b) The court may subsequently order the department of motor vehicles 13 to terminate the suspension of the respondent's driving privileges; 14 however, the court shall order the termination of such suspension when 15 the court is satisfied that the respondent has fully complied with the 16 requirements of all summonses, subpoenas and warrants relating to a 17 paternity [or child support] proceeding. 18 § 17. Subdivision (f) of section 115 of the family court act, as 19 amended by chapter 398 of the laws of 1997, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 (f) The family court has jurisdiction to direct the commencement of 22 proceedings to suspend the driving privileges, recreational licenses and 23 permits, and license, permit, registration or authority to practice of 24 persons who are delinquent in their [child or combined child and] spous- 25 al support obligations or persons who have failed, after receiving 26 appropriate notice, to comply with summonses, subpoenas or warrants 27 relating to paternity [and child support] proceedings as set forth in 28 sections four hundred fifty-eight-a, four hundred fifty-eight-b, four 29 hundred fifty-eight-c, five hundred forty-eight-a, five hundred forty- 30 eight-b, and five hundred forty-eight-c of this act. Such jurisdiction 31 shall include jurisdiction over all boards, departments, authorities or 32 offices of the state for the purposes of implementing such section. 33 § 18. Section 548-b of the family court act, as added by chapter 398 34 of the laws of 1997, is amended to read as follows: 35 § 548-b. Paternity [or child support] proceedings; suspension of 36 state professional, occupational and business licenses. (a) If the 37 respondent, after receiving appropriate notice, fails to comply with a 38 summons, subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity [or child support] 39 proceeding, and the court has determined that the respondent is 40 licensed, permitted or registered by or with a board, department, 41 authority or office of this state or one of its political subdivisions 42 or instrumentalities to conduct a trade, business, profession or occupa- 43 tion, the court may order such board, department, authority or office to 44 commence proceedings as required by law regarding the suspension of such 45 license, permit, registration or authority to practice and to inform the 46 court of the actions it has taken pursuant to such proceeding. 47 (b) The court may subsequently order such board, department, authority 48 or office to terminate the suspension of the respondent's license, 49 permit, registration or authority to practice; however, the court shall 50 order the termination of such suspension when the court is satisfied 51 that the respondent has fully complied with all summons, subpoenas and 52 warrants relating to a paternity [or child support] proceeding. 53 § 19. Section 548-c of the family court act, as added by chapter 398 54 of the laws of 1997, is amended to read as follows: 55 § 548-c. Paternity [or child support] proceedings; suspension of 56 recreational licenses. If the respondent, after receiving appropriate A. 7005 16 1 notice, fails to comply with a summons, subpoena, or warrant relating to 2 a paternity [or child support] proceeding, the court may order any agen- 3 cy responsible for the issuance of a recreational license to suspend or 4 to refuse to reissue a license to the respondent or to deny application 5 for such license by the respondent. The court may subsequently order 6 such agency to terminate the adverse action regarding the respondent's 7 license; however, the court shall order the termination of such suspen- 8 sion or other adverse action when the court is satisfied that the 9 respondent has fully complied with the requirements of all summons, 10 subpoenas, and warrants relating to a paternity [or child support] 11 proceeding. 12 § 20. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 13 the amendments to subdivision 4-e of section 510 of the vehicle and 14 traffic law made by section two of this act shall not affect the repeal 15 of such subdivision and shall be deemed repealed therewith; provided, 16 further that the amendments to subdivision 12 of section 111-b of the 17 social services law made by section three of this act shall not affect 18 the repeal of such subdivision and shall be deemed repealed therewith.